Utah statutes.
11-25-13.   Challenge of program, plan, or area -- Limitation.
Any action challenging the legality of a comprehensive residential
rehabilitation financing program, the selection of a residential
rehabilitation area, or the adoption of a plan for public improvements for a
residential rehabilitation area shall be commenced within 30 days of the
publication of the resolution, ordinance, or other proceedings adopting the
program or plan, or selecting the area. After this time no one shall have any
cause of action to contest the regularity, formality or legality thereof for
any cause whatsoever.
